California statutes. Education Code
(B) For all measurements of academic performance, the charter school has received performance levels schoolwide that are the same or lower than the state average and, for a majority of subgroups performing statewide below the state average in each respective year, received performance levels that
 are lower than the state average.

(2) A charter school that meets the criteria established by this subdivision and paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 47607 shall only qualify for treatment under this subdivision.

(3) The chartering authority shall consider the following factors, and may renew a charter that meets the criteria in paragraph (1) only upon making
 both of the following written factual
 findings, specific to the particular petition, setting forth specific facts to support the findings:

(A) The charter school is taking meaningful steps to address the underlying cause or causes of low performance, and those steps are reflected, or will be reflected, in a written plan adopted by the governing body of the charter school.

(B) There is clear and convincing
 evidence showing either of the following:

(i) The school achieved measurable increases in academic achievement, as defined by at least one year’s progress for each year in school.

(ii) Strong postsecondary outcomes, as defined by college enrollment, persistence, and completion rates equal to similar peers.

(C) Clauses (i) and (ii) of subparagraph (B) shall be demonstrated by verified data, as defined in subdivision (c).

(4) Verified data, as defined in subdivision (c), shall be considered by the chartering authority until June 30, 2028, for a charter school pursuant to this subdivision for the charter school’s next two subsequent renewals.

(5) For a charter renewed pursuant to this subdivision, the chartering authority may grant a renewal for a period of two years.

(b) (1) For all charter schools for which paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 47607 and subdivision (a) of this section do not apply, the chartering authority shall consider the schoolwide performance and performance of all subgroups of pupils served by the charter school on the state indicators included in the evaluation rubrics adopted pursuant to Section 52064.5 and the performance of the charter school on the local indicators included in the evaluation rubrics adopted pursuant to Section 52064.5.

(2) The chartering authority shall provide greater weight
 to performance on measurements of academic performance in determining whether to grant a charter renewal.

(3) In addition to the state and local indicators, the chartering authority shall consider clear and convincing evidence showing either of the following:

(A) The school achieved measurable increases in academic achievement, as defined by at least one year’s progress for each year in school.

(B) Strong postsecondary outcomes, as defined by college enrollment, persistence, and completion rates equal to similar peers.

(4) Subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (3) shall be demonstrated by verified data, as defined in subdivision (c).

(5) Verified data, as defined in subdivision (c), shall be considered by the chartering authority for the next two subsequent renewals until June 30, 2028, for a charter school pursuant to this paragraph.

(6) The chartering authority may deny a charter renewal pursuant to this subdivision only upon making written findings, setting forth specific facts to support the findings, that the charter school has failed to meet or make sufficient progress toward meeting standards that provide a benefit to the pupils of the school, that closure of the charter school is in the best interest of
 pupils, and, if applicable pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (3), that its decision provided greater weight to performance on measurements of academic performance.

(7) For a charter renewed pursuant to this subdivision, the chartering authority shall grant a renewal for a period of five years.

(c) (1) For purposes of this section, “verified data” means data derived from nationally recognized, valid, peer-reviewed, and reliable sources that are externally produced. Verified data shall include measures of postsecondary outcomes.

(2) The state board shall establish criteria to define verified data and identify an approved list of valid and reliable assessments that shall be used for this purpose.

(3) No data sources other than those adopted by the state board pursuant to paragraph (2) shall be used as verified data.

(4) Notwithstanding paragraph (3), a charter school under consideration for renewal before the state board’s adoption pursuant to paragraph (2) may present data consistent with this subdivision.

(5) Adoption of the criteria pursuant to this subdivision shall not be subject to the requirements of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(6) The state board may adopt and make necessary revisions to the criteria in accordance with the requirements of the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(7) Upon adoption of a pupil-level academic growth measure for English language arts and mathematics, the state board may reconsider criteria adopted pursuant to this subdivision.

(d) This section shall become
 inoperative on July 1, 2028, and as of January 1, 2029, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 96.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.   Inoperative July 1, 2028, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 97 of Stats. 2026, Ch. 65.)
-------------------------------------------

47607.2.

(a) (1) The chartering authority shall not renew a charter if either of the following apply for two consecutive years immediately preceding the renewal decision:

(A) The charter school has received the two lowest performance levels schoolwide on all the state indicators included in the evaluation rubrics adopted pursuant to Section 52064.5 for which it receives performance levels.

(B) For all measurements of academic performance, the charter school has received performance levels schoolwide that are the same or lower than the state average and, for a majority of subgroups performing statewide below the state average in each respective year, received
 performance levels that are lower than the state average.

(2) A charter school that meets the criteria established by this subdivision and paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 47607 shall only qualify for treatment under this subdivision.

(3) For a charter renewed pursuant to this subdivision, the chartering authority may grant a renewal for a period of two years.

(b) (1) For all charter schools for which paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 47607 and subdivision (a) of this section do not apply, the chartering authority shall consider the schoolwide performance and performance of all subgroups of pupils served by the charter school on the state indicators included in the evaluation rubrics adopted pursuant to Section 52064.5 and the performance of the charter school on the local
 indicators included in the evaluation rubrics adopted pursuant to Section 52064.5.

(2) The chartering authority shall provide greater weight to performance on measurements of academic performance in determining whether to grant a charter renewal.

(3) The chartering authority may deny a charter renewal pursuant to this subdivision only upon making written findings, setting forth specific facts to support the findings, that the charter school has failed to meet or make sufficient progress toward meeting standards that provide a benefit to the pupils of the school, that closure of the charter school is in the best interest of pupils, and, if applicable pursuant to paragraph (2), that its decision provided greater weight to performance on measurements of academic performance.

(4) For a charter renewed pursuant to this
 subdivision, the chartering authority shall grant a renewal for a period of five years.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2028.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 96) and added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 97.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

47607.3.

(a) Using an evaluation rubric adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 52064.5, and beginning with the 2025–26 school year, and every three years thereafter, for any charter school for which one or more pupil subgroups identified pursuant to Section 52052 meet the criteria established pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section
 52064.5, which may also include an all pupils subgroup as described in Section 52064.5, the county superintendent of schools in which the charter school is located shall provide technical assistance for a minimum of three years following the identification that shall be focused on building the charter school’s capacity to develop and implement actions and services responsive to pupil and community needs, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Assisting the charter school to identify its strengths and weaknesses in regard to the state priorities applicable to the charter school pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 47605. This shall include working collaboratively with the charter school to review performance data on the state and local indicators included in the California
 School Dashboard authorized by subdivision (f) of Section 52064.5 and other relevant local data, and to identify effective, evidence-based programs or practices that address any areas of weakness.

(2) Working collaboratively with the charter school to secure assistance from an academic, programmatic, or fiscal expert or team of experts to identify and implement effective programs and practices that are designed to improve performance in any areas of weakness identified by the charter school. The county superintendent of schools in which the charter school is located, in consultation with the charter school, may solicit another service provider, which may include, but is not limited to, a school district, county office of education, or charter school, to act as a partner to the charter school in need of technical assistance.

(3) Obtaining from the charter school timely
 documentation demonstrating that it has completed the activities described in paragraphs (1) and (2), or substantially similar activities, or has selected another service provider to work with the charter school to complete the activities described in paragraphs (1) and (2), or substantially similar activities, and ongoing communication with the chartering authority to assess the charter school’s progress in improving pupil outcomes.

(b) (1) For purposes of this section, the geographic lead agency, as identified pursuant to Section 52073, or its designee, as identified in subdivision (d) of Section 52071, shall serve in the role of the county superintendent of schools for a charter school authorized by the county board of education.

(2) The geographic lead agency shall choose a designee to provide the technical assistance pursuant to subdivision (a) for any
 charter school for whom the geographic lead agency’s county board of education is the chartering authority. The geographic lead agency shall contract with the designee using the funds allocated pursuant to
 Sections 2575.3 and 2575.35.

(c) If the charter school meets the criteria established for school districts under subdivision (a) of Section 52072, the county superintendent of schools in the county which the charter school is located may request assistance from the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence. The California Collaborative for Educational Excellence may, after consulting with the Superintendent, and with the approval of the state board, provide advice and assistance to the charter school pursuant to Section 52074.

(d) A chartering authority shall consider for revocation any charter school to
 which the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence has provided advice and assistance pursuant to subdivision (c) and about which it has made either of the following findings, which shall be submitted to the chartering authority:

(1) That the charter school has failed, or is unable, to implement the recommendations of the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence.

(2) That the inadequate performance of the charter school, based upon an evaluation rubric adopted pursuant to Section 52064.5, is either so persistent or so acute as to require revocation of the charter.

(e) The chartering authority shall consider increases in pupil academic achievement for all pupil subgroups served by the charter school in determining whether to revoke the charter.

(f) A chartering authority shall comply with the hearing process described in subdivisions (g) and (h) of Section 47607 in revoking a charter. A charter school may not appeal a revocation of a charter made pursuant to this section.

(g) If the governing body of a charter school requests technical assistance, the chartering authority shall provide technical assistance consistent with paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a). If a charter school has not been identified for technical assistance pursuant to subdivision (a), the chartering authority may assess the charter school a fee not to exceed the cost of the service.

(h) A charter school shall accept the technical assistance provided pursuant to subdivision (a). For purposes of accepting technical assistance, a charter school may satisfy this requirement by providing the timely documentation to the county
 superintendent of schools of the county in which the charter school is located, and maintaining regular communication with the chartering authority.

(i) For a charter school that is eligible for alternate methods for calculating the state and local indicators pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 52064.5, technical assistance provided pursuant to subdivision (a) shall take into account the charter school’s performance on alternative metrics applicable to the charter school based on the pupil population served.

(j) This section shall not preclude a charter school from soliciting technical assistance from other entities at its own expense.

(k) For a charter school operating before July 1, 2020, subdivision (a) as it read on January 1, 2019, shall apply until June 30, 2022.

(l) The requirements of this section shall not be waived by the state board pursuant to Section 33050 or any other law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 65, Sec. 98.   (AB 126)   Effective July 9, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

47607.4.

Notwithstanding the renewal process and criteria established in Sections 47605.9, 47607, and 47607.2 or any other law, effective July 1, 2021, all charter schools whose term expires on or between January 1, 2022, and June 30, 2025, inclusive, shall have their term extended by two years, and all charter schools whose term expires on or between January 1, 2024, and June 30, 2027, inclusive, shall have their term extended by one additional year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 48, Sec. 43.   (SB 114)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

47607.5.

(a) Except for charter schools authorized pursuant to Section 47605.6, if either a school district governing board or a county board of education, as a chartering authority, does not grant a renewal to a charter school pursuant to Section 47607 or 47607.2, the charter school may appeal the decision pursuant to the procedures pertaining to a denial of a petition for establishment of a charter school, as provided in subdivision (k) of Section 47605 for review in accordance with Section 47607.

(b) The requirements of this section shall not be waived by the state board pursuant to Section 33050 or any other law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 24, Sec. 46.   (SB 98)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

47607.8.

The department, in consultation with the state board, shall collect data to track implementation of Chapter 486 of the Statutes of 2019 (Assembly Bill 1505 of the 2019-20 Regular Session).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 75.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

47608.

All meetings of the governing board of the school district and the county board of education at which the granting, revocation, appeal, or renewal of a charter petition is discussed shall comply with the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 34, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Charter School Operation [47610. - 47615.]

47610.

A charter school shall comply with this part and all of the provisions set forth in its charter, but is otherwise exempt from the laws governing school districts, except all of the following:

(a) As specified in Section 47611.

(b) As specified in Section 41365.

(c) All laws establishing minimum age for public school attendance.

(d) The California Building Standards Code (Part 2 (commencing with Section 101) of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations), as adopted and enforced by the local building enforcement agency with jurisdiction over the area in which the charter school is located.

(e) Charter school facilities shall comply with subdivision (d) by January 1, 2007.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 110.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

47610.5.

A charter school facility is exempt from the requirements of subdivision (d) of Section 47610 if either of the following conditions apply:

(a) The charter school facility complies with Article 3 (commencing with Section 17280) and Article 6 (commencing with Section 17365) of Chapter 3 of Part 10.5.

(b) The charter school facility is exclusively owned or controlled by an entity that is not subject to the California Building Standards Code, including, but not limited to, the federal government.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 111.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

47611.

(a) If a charter school chooses to make the State Teacher’s Retirement Plan available, all employees of the charter school who perform creditable service shall be entitled to have that service covered under the plan’s Defined Benefit Program or Cash Balance Benefit Program, and all provisions of Part 13 (commencing with Section 22000) and Part 14 (commencing with Section 26000) shall apply in the same manner as the provisions apply to other public schools in the school district that granted the charter.

(b) (1) If a charter school offers its employees coverage by the State Teachers’ Retirement System or the Public Employees’ Retirement System, or both, the charter school shall inform all applicants for positions within that charter school of the retirement system options for employees of the charter school.

(2) The information shall specifically include whether the charter school makes available to employees coverage under the State Teachers’ Retirement System, the Public Employees’ Retirement System, or both systems, and that accepting employment in the charter school may exclude the applicant from further coverage in the applicant’s current retirement system, depending on the retirement options offered by the charter of the charter school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1025, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

47611.3.

(a) At the request of a charter school, a school district or county office of education that is the chartering authority of a charter school shall create any reports required by the State Teachers’ Retirement System and the Public Employees’ Retirement System. The county superintendent of schools, employing agency, or school district that reports to those systems pursuant to Section 23004 of this code or Section 20221 of the Government Code shall submit the required reports on behalf of the charter school. The school district or county office of education may charge the charter school for the actual costs of the reporting services.

(b) As a condition of creating and submitting reports for the State Teachers’ Retirement System and the Public Employees Retirement System, the school district or county office of education shall not require a charter school to purchase payroll processing services from the chartering authority. Information submitted on behalf of the charter school to the State Teachers’ Retirement System, the Public Employees’ Retirement System, or both, shall be in a format conforming to the requirements of those systems.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 466, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

47611.5.

(a) Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code shall apply to charter schools.

(b) A charter school charter shall contain a declaration regarding whether or not the charter school shall be deemed the exclusive public school employer of the employees at the charter school for the purposes of Section 3540.1 of the Government Code. If the charter school is not so deemed a public school employer, the school district where the charter is located shall be deemed the public school employer for the purposes of Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of the Government Code.

(c) If the charter of a
 charter school does not specify that it shall comply with those statutes and regulations governing public school employers that establish and regulate tenure or a merit or civil service system, the scope of representation for that charter school shall also include discipline and dismissal of charter school employees.

(d) The Public Employment Relations Board shall take into account the Charter Schools Act of 1992 (Part 26.8 (commencing with Section 47600)) when deciding cases brought before it related to charter schools.

(e) The approval or a denial of a charter petition by a granting agency pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 47605 shall not be controlled by collective bargaining agreements nor subject to review or regulation by the Public Employment Relations Board.

(f) By March 31, 2000, all existing charter
 schools must declare whether or not they shall be deemed a public school employer in accordance with subdivision (b), and that declaration shall not be materially inconsistent with the charter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 76.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

47612.

(a) A charter school shall be deemed to be under the exclusive control of the officers of the public schools for purposes of Section 8 of Article IX of the California Constitution, with regard to the appropriation of public moneys to be apportioned to any charter school, including, but not necessarily limited to, appropriations made for purposes of this chapter.

(b) The average daily attendance in a charter school may not, in any event, be generated by a pupil who is not a California resident. To remain eligible for generating charter school apportionments, a pupil over 19 years of age shall be continuously enrolled in public school and make satisfactory progress towards award of a high school diploma. The state board
 shall, on or before January 1, 2000, adopt regulations defining “satisfactory progress.”

(c) A charter school shall be deemed to be a “school district” for purposes of Article 1 (commencing with Section 14000) of Chapter 1 of Part 9 of Division 1 of Title 1, Section 41301, Section 41302.5, Article 10 (commencing with Section 41850) of Chapter 5 of Part 24 of Division 3, Section 47638, and Sections 8 and 8.5 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.

(d) For purposes of calculating average daily attendance, no pupil shall generate more than one day of attendance in a calendar day. Notwithstanding any other law, a charter school that operates a multitrack calendar shall comply with all of the following:

(1) Calculate attendance separately for each track. The divisor in the calculation shall be the calendar days in
 which school was taught for pupils in each track.

(2) Operate no more than five tracks.

(3) Operate each track for a minimum of 175 days. If the charter school is a conversion school, the charter school may continue its previous schedule as long as it provides no fewer than 163 days of instruction in each track.

(4) For each track, provide the total number of instructional minutes, as specified in Section 47612.5.

(5) No track shall have less than 55 percent of its schooldays before April 15.

(6) Unless otherwise authorized by statute, no pupil shall generate more than one unit of average daily attendance in a fiscal year.

(e) Compliance with the conditions set forth in this section shall be included in the audits conducted pursuant to Section 41020.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 357, Sec. 33.   (SB 97)   Effective September 26, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

47612.1.

(a) Except for the requirement that a pupil be a California resident, subdivision (b) of Section 47612 shall not apply to a charter school program that provides instruction exclusively in partnership with any of the following:

(1) The federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (29 U.S.C. Sec. 3101 et seq.).

(2) Federally affiliated Youth Build programs.

(3) Federal job corps training or instruction provided pursuant to a memorandum of understanding with the federal provider.

(4) The California Conservation Corps or local
 conservation corps certified by the California Conservation Corps pursuant to Section 14406 or 14507.5 of the Public Resources Code.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2015.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 186, Sec. 48.   (AB 2659)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

47612.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law and as a condition of apportionment, a charter school shall do all of the following:

(1) For each fiscal year, offer, at a minimum, the following number of minutes of instruction:

(A) To pupils in kindergarten, 36,000 minutes.

(B) To pupils in grades 1 to 3, inclusive, 50,400 minutes.

(C) To pupils in grades 4 to 8, inclusive, 54,000 minutes.

(D) To pupils in grades 9 to 12,
 inclusive, 64,800 minutes.

(2) Maintain written contemporaneous records that document all pupil attendance and make these records available for audit and inspection.

(3) Certify that its pupils have participated in the state testing programs specified in Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 60600) of Part 33 in the same manner as other pupils attending public schools as a condition of apportionment of state funding.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law and except to the extent inconsistent with this section and Section 47634.2, a charter school that provides independent study shall comply with Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 51745) of Chapter 5 of Part 28 and implementing regulations adopted thereunder. The state
 board shall adopt regulations that apply this article to charter schools. To the extent that these regulations concern the qualifications of instructional personnel, the state board shall be guided by subdivision (l) of Section 47605.

(c) A reduction in apportionment made pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be proportional to the magnitude of the exception that causes the reduction. For purposes of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), for each charter school that fails to offer pupils the minimum number of minutes of instruction specified in that paragraph, the Superintendent shall withhold from the charter school’s apportionment for average daily attendance of the affected pupils, by grade level, the sum of that apportionment multiplied by the percentage of the minimum number of minutes of instruction at each grade level that the
 charter school failed to offer.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding any other law and except as provided in paragraph (1) of subdivision (e), a charter school that has an approved charter may receive funding for nonclassroom-based instruction only if a determination for funding is made pursuant to Section 47634.2 by the
 state board. The determination for funding shall be subject to any conditions or limitations the state board may prescribe. The state board shall adopt regulations on or before February 1, 2002, that define and establish general rules governing nonclassroom-based instruction that apply to all charter schools and to the process for determining funding of nonclassroom-based instruction by charter schools offering nonclassroom-based instruction other than the nonclassroom-based instruction allowed by paragraph (1) of subdivision (e). Nonclassroom-based instruction includes, but is not limited to, independent study, home study, work study, and distance and computer-based education. In prescribing any conditions or limitations relating to the qualifications of instructional personnel, the state board shall be guided by subdivision (l) of Section 47605.

(2) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 47634.2, a charter school that receives a determination pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 47634.2 is not required to reapply annually for a funding determination of its nonclassroom-based instruction program if an update of the information the state board reviewed when initially determining funding would not require material revision, as that term is defined in regulations adopted by the board. A charter school that has achieved a rank of 6 or greater on the Academic Performance Index for the two years immediately before receiving a funding determination pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 47634.2 shall receive a five-year determination and is not required to annually reapply for a funding determination of its nonclassroom-based instruction program if an update
 of the information the state board reviewed when initially determining funding would not require material revision, as that term is defined in regulations adopted by the state board. Notwithstanding any law, the state board may require a charter school to provide updated information at any time it determines that a review of that information is necessary. The state board may terminate a determination for funding if updated or additional information requested by the board is not made available to the board by the charter school within a reasonable amount of time or if the information otherwise supports termination. A determination for funding pursuant to Section 47634.2 shall not exceed five years.

(3) A charter school that offers nonclassroom-based instruction in excess of the amount authorized by paragraph (1) of
 subdivision (e) is subject to the determination for funding requirement of Section 47634.2 to receive funding each time its charter is renewed or materially revised pursuant to Section 47607. A charter school that materially revises its charter to offer nonclassroom-based instruction in excess of the amount authorized by paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) is subject to the determination for funding requirement of Section 47634.2.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, and as a condition of apportionment, “classroom-based instruction” in a charter school, for purposes of this part, occurs only when charter school pupils are engaged in educational activities required of those pupils and are under the immediate supervision and control of an employee of the charter school who possesses a valid certification document
 registered as required by law. For purposes of calculating average daily attendance for classroom-based instruction apportionments, at least 80 percent of the instructional time offered by the charter school shall be at the schoolsite, and the charter school shall require the attendance of all pupils for whom a classroom-based apportionment is claimed at the schoolsite for at least 80 percent of the minimum instructional time required to be offered pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(2) For the purposes of this part, “nonclassroom instruction” or “nonclassroom-based instruction” means instruction that does not meet the requirements specified in paragraph (1). The
 state board may adopt regulations pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) specifying other conditions or limitations on what constitutes nonclassroom-based instruction, as it deems appropriate and consistent with this part.

(3) For purposes of this part, a schoolsite is a facility that is used principally for classroom instruction.

(4) Notwithstanding any other law, neither the state board nor the Superintendent may waive the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 24, Sec. 47.   (SB 98)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

47612.6.

(a) The State Board of Education may waive fiscal penalties calculated pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 47612.5 for a charter school that fails to offer the minimum number of instructional minutes required pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 47612.5 for the fiscal year.

(b) For fiscal penalties incurred as a result of providing insufficient instructional minutes in the 2002–03 fiscal year, or any fiscal year thereafter, the State Board of Education may grant a waiver only upon the condition that the charter school agrees to maintain minutes of instruction equal to those minutes of instruction it failed to offer and the minimum number of instructional minutes required pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 47612.5 for twice the number of years that it failed to maintain the required minimum number of instructional minutes for the fiscal year. Compliance with the condition shall commence no later than the school year following the fiscal year that the waiver was granted and shall continue for each subsequent school year until the condition is satisfied.

(c) Compliance with the condition set forth in subdivision (b) shall be verified in the report of the annual audit of the charter school for each fiscal year in which it is required to maintain additional time pursuant to subdivision (b). If the audit report for a year in which the additional time is required to be maintained does not verify that the additional time was provided, the waiver granted pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be revoked and the charter school shall repay the fiscal penalty calculated pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 47612.5, in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 41344.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that charter schools make every effort to make up any instructional minutes lost during the fiscal year in which the loss occurred rather than seek a waiver pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 543, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

47612.7.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law and except as provided in subdivision (b), from January 1, 2020, to January 1, 2026, inclusive, the approval of a petition for the establishment of a new charter school, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 47612.5, is prohibited.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to a nonclassroom-based charter school that was granted approval of its petition and providing educational services to pupils before October 1, 2019, under either of the following circumstances:

(1) If Assembly Bill 1507 of the 2019–20 Regular Session amends Section 47605.1 and becomes operative on January 1, 2020, and the charter school is required to submit a petition to the
 governing board of a school district or county board of education in an adjacent county in which its existing resource center is located in order to comply with Section 47605.1, as amended by Assembly Bill 1507 of the 2019–20 Regular Session, or to retain current program offerings or enrollment.

(2) If a charter school is required to submit a petition to a school district or county board of education in which a resource center is located in order to comply with the court decision in Anderson Union High School District v. Shasta Secondary Home School (2016) 4 Cal.App.5th 262, or other relevant court ruling, and the petition is necessary to retain current program offerings or enrollment.

(3) A charter school authorized by a different chartering authority pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) shall be regarded by the department as a continuing charter school for all purposes to the
 extent it does not conflict with federal law. In order to prevent any potential conflict with federal law, this paragraph does not apply to covered programs as identified in Section 8101(11) of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 7801) to the extent the affected charter school is the restructured portion of a divided charter school pursuant to Section 47654.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 33050 or any other law, the state board shall not waive the restrictions described in this section.

(d) (1) No later than October 1, 2023, the Legislative Analyst and the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team shall study the processes used to determine funding for nonclassroom-based charter schools.

(2) The study shall identify and make recommendations on
 potential improvements to the processes, including recommendations for enhancing oversight and reducing fraud, waste, and abuse.

(3) No later than March 1, 2024, the Legislative Analyst and the County Office Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team shall report to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature, the Department of Finance, the department, and the executive director of the state board on recommendations and observations as a result of the study. These recommendations or observations shall consider the fiscal impact on the state.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 48, Sec. 44.   (SB 114)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

47613.

(a) Except as set forth in subdivision (b), a chartering authority may charge for the actual costs of supervisorial oversight of a charter school not to exceed 1 percent of the revenue of the charter school.

(b) A chartering authority may charge for the actual costs of supervisorial oversight of a charter school not to exceed 3 percent of the revenue of the charter school if the charter school is able to obtain substantially rent free facilities from the chartering authority.

(c) A local educational agency that is given the responsibility for supervisorial oversight of a charter school, pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (k) of Section 47605, may charge
 for the actual costs of supervisorial oversight, and administrative costs necessary to secure charter school funding. A charter school that is charged for costs under this subdivision may not be charged pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b).

(d) This section does not prevent the charter school from separately purchasing administrative or other services from the chartering authority or any other source.
